Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS

§412:2-300 Enforcement actions. In
enforcing the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to use
the powers in this part without limitation to direct the discontinuance of any
violation of law, or any unsafe or unsound practice that is likely to cause
insolvency or substantial dissipation of assets or earnings of the
institution. The provisions of this chapter may be enforced by informal or
formal actions. Informal actions include board resolutions, letter agreements,
records of action, memoranda of understanding, or supervisory agreements.
Formal actions include cease and desist orders (whether temporary or
permanent), removal orders, suspension and revocation orders, divestiture
orders, and orders enforcing statutory provisions. Any person who is the
subject of formal or informal enforcement action by the commissioner may
consent to the entry of any formal order. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 1998,
c 196, §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next